North Carolina, session 2025, SB490.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 133-17 reads as rewritten:
"§ 133-17. Administrative payments.payment; appeal.
(a) Administrative Payment. – Nothing contained in this Article shall be construed as
creating in any condemnation proceedings brought under the power of eminent domain, any
element of damages not in existence on the date of enactment of this Article. Payments made and
services rendered under this Article are administrative payments and in addition to just
compensation as provided by the law of eminent domain. Nothing contained in this Article shall
be construed as creating any right enforceable in any court and the determination of the agency
under the procedure provided for in G.S. 133-14 shall be conclusive and not subject to judicial
review.
(b) Appeal. – Any person who is aggrieved by an agency determination, including one
deciding a claim submitted for funding assistance under this Article or applicable federal law, by
an agency head or administrative officer under the procedure provided for in G.S. 133-14 after
exhausting all administrative remedies made available to him by rules and regulations enacted
pursuant to this Article is entitled to judicial review of the agency determination under this
Article. In order to obtain judicial review of the final agency determination under this Article,
the person seeking review must file a petition in the superior court of the county in which the
displacement has occurred or will occur within 30 days after written copy of the final agency
determination is served upon the person seeking review. In a final agency determination, the
agency shall notify the person of the appeal rights under this section. Failure to file such a petition
within the time stated waives the right of such person to review under this section. For good
cause shown, however, the superior court may accept an untimely petition.
The petition shall state explicitly what exceptions are taken to the agency determination and
what relief the petitioner seeks. Within 10 days after the petition is filed with the court, the person
seeking the review shall serve copies of the petition by registered mail, return receipt requested,
upon the agency. Within 30 days after receipt of the copy of the petition for review, or within
such additional time as the court may allow, the agency shall transmit to the reviewing court a
certified copy of the agency determination.
An aggrieved person is not estopped or barred from pursuing an appeal of a final agency
determination as a result of such person receiving funding assistance or other assistance under
this Article prior to or during the pendency of the appeal. The review of the agency determination
under this Article shall be conducted by the court without a jury and shall hear the matter de novo
pursuant to the rules of evidence and procedures as applied in the general court of justice. The
*S490-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
court, after hearing the matter, may affirm, reverse, or modify the agency determination if it is
one or more of the following:
(1) In violation of constitutional provisions;
(2) Not made in accordance with this Article or rules or regulations promulgated
by the agency or not in accordance with applicable federal law; or
(3) Affected by other error or law.
The party aggrieved shall have the burden of showing that the agency determination was
violative of one of the above.
A party to the review proceedings, including the agency, may appeal to the appellate division
from the final judgment of the superior court under the rules of procedure applicable in other
civil cases. The appealing party may apply to the superior court for a stay for its final
determination or a stay of the agency determination, whichever shall be appropriate, pending the
outcome of the appeal to the appellate division."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to administrative
proceedings for which a final determination is entered on or after that date.
Page 2 Senate Bill 490-First Edition